Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.040

Community preservation and development authority account.

The community preservation and development authority account is created in the state treasury. The account is composed of two subaccounts, one for moneys to be appropriated for operating purposes, and the other for moneys to be appropriated for capital purposes. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account may be used only for projects under this chapter.

[ 2007 c 501 s 7.]